Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5016.01
Oath, affirmation, or statement; perjury.

Each appeal or petition filed with the commission shall be deemed to include an oath, affirmation, or statement to the effect that its representations are true as far as the person executing or filing it knows or should know. Any person who willfully falsifies any such representation shall be guilty of perjury and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as provided by section 28-915.

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 52.